Utah statutes.
41-3-802.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1) (a)  "Consignee" means a dealer who accepts vehicles for sale under an agreement that the dealer will pay the consignor for any sold vehicle and will return any unsold vehicles.

(b)  "Consignee" does not include a wholesale motor vehicle auction.

(2)  "Consignor" means a person who places a vehicle with a consignee for consignment sale.



Amended by Chapter 7, 1995 General Session

